Rhode Island, session 2025, SB796.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-11-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-11 entitled "Sexually
Transmitted Diseases" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-11-8. Blood test of pregnant women.
It shall be the duty of every physician, midwife, physician assistant and nurse practitioner
engaged in prenatal attendance upon a pregnant woman to obtain a blood specimen of that pregnant
woman within thirty (30) days after the first professional visit and again obtain a blood specimen
during the third trimester. That blood specimen These blood specimens shall be submitted to the
laboratory of the state department of health, or to a laboratory approved by the department, for the
performance of a Wassermann or other standard laboratory blood test for syphilis. Any violation
of the provisions of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor and that physician, midwife,
physician assistant or nurse practitioner shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more
than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001422/SUB A
========